Idaho statutes. Title 16 JUVENILE PROCEEDINGS
Chapter 16
CHILD PROTECTIVE ACT

Sec.

§ 16-1601. Policy.

The policy of the state of Idaho is hereby declared to be the establishment of a legal framework conducive to the judicial processing, including periodic review of child abuse, abandonment and neglect cases, and the protection of any child whose life, health or welfare is endangered. At all times, the health and safety of the child shall be the primary concern. Each child coming within the purview of this chapter shall receive, preferably in his own home, the care, guidance and control that will promote his welfare and the best interest of the state of Idaho, and if he is removed from the control of one (1) or more of his parents, guardian or other custodian, the state shall secure adequate care for him; provided, however, that the state of Idaho shall, to the fullest extent possible, seek to preserve, protect, enhance and reunite the family relationship. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to allow discrimination on the basis of disability. This chapter seeks to coordinate efforts by state and local public agencies, in cooperation with private agencies and organizations, citizens’ groups, and concerned individuals, to:

Preserve the privacy and unity of the family whenever possible;

Take such actions as may be necessary and feasible to prevent the abuse, neglect, abandonment or homelessness of children;

Take such actions as may be necessary to provide the child with permanency including concurrent planning;

Clarify for the purposes of this act the rights and responsibilities of parents with joint legal or joint physical custody of children at risk; and

Maintain sibling bonds by placing siblings in the same home when possible, and support or facilitate sibling visitation when not, unless such contact is not in the best interest of one (1) or more of the children.

§ 16-1602. Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter:

“Abused” means any case in which a child has been the victim of:

Conduct or omission resulting in skin bruising, bleeding, malnutrition, burns, fracture of any bone, head injury, soft tissue swelling, failure to thrive or death, and such condition or death is not justifiably explained, or where the history given concerning such condition or death is at variance with the degree or type of such condition or death, or the circumstances indicate that such condition or death may not be the product of an accidental occurrence; or

Sexual conduct, including rape, molestation, incest, prostitution, obscene or pornographic photographing, filming or depiction for commercial purposes, human trafficking as defined in section 18-8602, Idaho Code, or other similar forms of sexual exploitation harming or threatening the child’s health or welfare or mental injury to the child.

“Abandoned” means the failure of the parent to maintain a normal parental relationship with his child including, but not limited to, reasonable support or regular personal contact. Failure to maintain this relationship without just cause for a period of one (1) year shall constitute prima facie evidence of abandonment.

“Adaptive equipment” means any piece of equipment or any item that is used to increase, maintain or improve the parenting capabilities of a parent with a disability.

“Adjudicatory hearing” means a hearing to determine:

Whether the child comes under the jurisdiction of the court pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

Whether continuation of the child in the home would be contrary to the child’s welfare and whether the best interest of the child requires protective supervision or vesting legal custody of the child in an authorized agency.

“Age of developmentally appropriate” means:

Activities that are generally accepted as suitable for children of the same chronological age or level of maturity or that are determined to be developmentally appropriate for a child, based on the development of cognitive, emotional, physical and behavioral capacities that are typical for an age or age group; and

In the case of a specific child, activities or items that are suitable for the child based on the developmental stages attained by the child with respect to the cognitive, emotional, physical and behavioral capacities of the child.

“Aggravated circumstances” includes, but is not limited to:

Circumstances in which the parent has engaged in any of the following:

Abandonment, chronic abuse or chronic neglect of the child. Chronic neglect or chronic abuse of a child shall consist of abuse or neglect that is so extreme or repetitious as to indicate that return of the child to the home would result in unacceptable risk to the health and welfare of the child.

Sexual abuse against a child of the parent. Sexual abuse, for the purposes of this section, includes any conduct described in section 18-1506, 18-1506A, 18-1507, 18-1508, 18-1508A, 18-6101, 18-6608 or 18-8602, Idaho Code.

Torture of a child; any conduct listed in section 18-8303(1), Idaho Code; battery or an injury to a child that results in serious or great bodily injury to a child; voluntary manslaughter of a child, or aiding or abetting such voluntary manslaughter, soliciting such voluntary manslaughter or attempting or conspiring to commit such voluntary manslaughter;

The parent has committed murder, aided or abetted a murder, solicited a murder or attempted or conspired to commit murder; or

The parental rights of the parent to another child have been terminated involuntarily.

“Authorized agency” means the department, a local agency, a person, an organization, corporation, benevolent society or association licensed or approved by the department or the court to receive children for control, care, maintenance or placement.

“Caregiver” means a foster parent with whom a child in foster care has been placed or a designated official for a child care institution in which a child in foster care has been placed.

“Case plan hearing” means a hearing to approve, modify or reject the case plan as provided in section 16-1621, Idaho Code.

“Child” means an individual who is under the age of eighteen (18) years.

“Child advocacy center” or “CAC” means an organization that adheres to national best practice standards established by the national membership and accrediting body for children’s advocacy centers and that promotes a comprehensive and coordinated multidisciplinary team response to allegations of child abuse by maintaining a child-friendly facility at which appropriate services are provided. These services may include forensic interviews, forensic medical examinations, mental health services and other related victim services.

“Circumstances of the child” includes, but is not limited to, the joint legal custody or joint physical custody of the child.

“Commit” means to transfer legal and physical custody.

“Concurrent planning” means a planning model that prepares for and implements different outcomes at the same time.

“Court” means district court or magistrate’s division thereof, or if the context requires, a magistrate or judge thereof.

“Custodian” means a person, other than a parent or legal guardian, to whom legal or joint legal custody of the child has been given by court order.

“Department” means the department of health and welfare and its authorized representatives.

“Disability” means, with respect to an individual, any mental or physical impairment that substantially limits one (1) or more major life activity of the individual including, but not limited to, self-care, manual tasks, walking, seeing, hearing, speaking, learning or working, or a record of such an impairment, or being regarded as having such an impairment. Disability shall not include transvestism, transsexualism, pedophilia, exhibitionism, voyeurism, other sexual behavior disorders, or substance use disorders, compulsive gambling, kleptomania or pyromania. Sexual preference or orientation is not considered an impairment or disability. Whether an impairment substantially limits a major life activity shall be determined without consideration of the effect of corrective or mitigating measures used to reduce the effects of the impairment.

“Family or household member” shall have the same meaning as in section 39-6303(6), Idaho Code.

“Foster care” means twenty-four (24) hour substitute parental care for children placed away from their parents or guardians by persons who may or may not be related to the children and for whom the state agency has placement and care responsibility.

“Foster parent” means a person or persons licensed to provide foster care.

“Grant administrator” means the supreme court or any organization or agency as may be designated by the supreme court in accordance with such procedures as may be adopted by the supreme court. The grant administrator shall administer funds from the guardian ad litem account in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

“Guardian ad litem” means a person appointed by the court pursuant to a guardian ad litem volunteer program to act as special advocate for a child under this chapter.

“Guardian ad litem coordinator” means a person or entity receiving moneys from the grant administrator for the purpose of carrying out any of the duties set forth in section 16-1632, Idaho Code.

“Guardian ad litem program” means the program to recruit, train and coordinate volunteer persons to serve as guardians ad litem for abused, neglected or abandoned children.

“Homeless,” as used in this chapter, shall mean that the child is without adequate shelter or other living facilities, and the lack of such shelter or other living facilities poses a threat to the health, safety or well-being of the child.

“Idaho network of children’s advocacy centers” means an organization that provides education and technical assistance to child advocacy centers and to interagency multidisciplinary teams developed pursuant to section 16-1617, Idaho Code.

“Law enforcement agency” means a city police department, the prosecuting attorney of any county, state law enforcement officers, or the office of a sheriff of any county.

“Legal custody” means a relationship created by court order, which vests in a custodian the following rights and responsibilities:

To have physical custody and control of the child, and to determine where and with whom the child shall live.

To supply the child with food, clothing, shelter and incidental necessities.

To provide the child with care, education and discipline.

To authorize ordinary medical, dental, psychiatric, psychological, or other remedial care and treatment for the child, including care and treatment in a facility with a program of services for children, and to authorize surgery if the surgery is deemed by two (2) physicians licensed to practice in this state to be necessary for the child.

Where the parents share legal custody, the custodian may be vested with the custody previously held by either or both parents.

“Mental injury” means a substantial impairment in the intellectual or psychological ability of a child to function within a normal range of performance and/or behavior, for short or long terms.

“Neglected” means a child:

Who is without proper parental care and control, or subsistence, medical or other care or control necessary for his well-being because of the conduct or omission of his parents, guardian or other custodian or their neglect or refusal to provide them; however, no child whose parent or guardian chooses for such child treatment by prayers through spiritual means alone in lieu of medical treatment shall be deemed for that reason alone to be neglected or lack parental care necessary for his health and well-being, but this subsection shall not prevent the court from acting pursuant to section 16-1627, Idaho Code; or

Whose parents, guardian or other custodian are unable to discharge their responsibilities to and for the child and, as a result of such inability, the child lacks the parental care necessary for his health, safety or well-being; or

Who has been placed for care or adoption in violation of law; or

Who is without proper education because of the failure to comply with section 33-202, Idaho Code.

“Permanency hearing” means a hearing to review, approve, reject or modify the permanency plan of the department, and review reasonable efforts in accomplishing the permanency plan.

“Permanency plan” means a plan for a continuous residence and maintenance of nurturing relationships during the child’s minority.

“Protective order” means an order issued by the court in a child protection case, prior to the adjudicatory hearing, to enable the child to remain in the home pursuant to section 16-1615(8), Idaho Code, or following an adjudicatory hearing to preserve the unity of the family and to ensure the best interests of the child, pursuant to section 16-1619(10), Idaho Code. Such an order shall be in the same form and have the same effect as a domestic violence protection order issued pursuant to chapter 63, title 39, Idaho Code. A protective order shall be for a period not to exceed three (3) months unless otherwise stated in the order.

“Protective supervision” is a legal status created by court order in a child protective case whereby the child is in the legal custody of his or her parent(s), guardian(s) or other legal custodian(s), subject to supervision by the department.

“Psychotropic medication” means a drug prescribed to affect psychological functioning, perception, behavior or mood. Psychotropic medications include, but are not limited to, antidepressants, mood stabilizers, antipsychotics, antianxiety medications, sedatives and stimulants.

“Reasonable and prudent parent standard” means the standard of care characterized by careful and sensible parental decisions that maintain the health, safety and best interests of a child while simultaneously encouraging the emotional and developmental growth of the child that a caregiver shall use when determining whether to allow a child in foster care under the responsibility of the state to participate in extracurricular, enrichment, cultural or social activities.

“Relative” means a child’s grandparent, great grandparent, aunt, great aunt, uncle, great uncle, brother-in-law, sister-in-law, first cousin, sibling and half-sibling.

“Residual parental rights and responsibilities” means those rights and responsibilities remaining with the parents after the transfer of legal custody including, but not necessarily limited to, the right of visitation, the right to consent to adoption, the right to determine religious affiliation, the right to family counseling when beneficial, and the responsibility for support.

“Shelter care” means places designated by the department for temporary care of children pending court disposition or placement.

“Supportive services,” as used in this chapter, shall mean services that assist parents with a disability to compensate for those aspects of their disability that affect their ability to care for their child and that will enable them to discharge their parental responsibilities. The term includes specialized or adapted training, evaluations or assistance with effectively using adaptive equipment and accommodations that allow parents with a disability to benefit from other services including, but not limited to, Braille texts or sign language interpreters.

§ 16-1603. Jurisdiction of the courts.

Except as otherwise provided herein, the court shall have exclusive original jurisdiction in all proceedings under this chapter concerning any child living or found within the state:

Who is neglected, abused or abandoned by his parents, guardian or other legal custodian, or who is homeless; or

Whose parents or other legal custodian fails to provide a stable home environment.

If the court has taken jurisdiction over a child under subsection (1) of this section, it may take jurisdiction over another child living or having custodial visitation in the same household without the filing of a separate petition if it finds all of the following:

The other child is living or is found within the state;

The other child has been exposed to or is at risk of being a victim of abuse, neglect or abandonment;

The other child is listed in the petition or amended petition;

The parents or legal guardians of the other child have notice as provided in section 16-1611, Idaho Code.

§ 16-1604. Retention of jurisdiction.

Jurisdiction obtained by the court under this chapter shall be retained until the child’s eighteenth birthday, unless terminated prior thereto. Jurisdiction of the court shall not be terminated by an order of termination of parental rights if guardianship and/or custody of the child is placed with the department of health and welfare.

The parties have an ongoing duty to inquire concerning, and inform the court as soon as possible about, any other pending actions or current orders involving the child. In the event there are conflicting orders from Idaho courts concerning the child, the child protection order is controlling.

§ 16-1605. Reporting of abuse, abandonment or neglect.

Any physician, resident on a hospital staff, intern, nurse, coroner, school teacher, day care personnel, social worker, or other person having reason to believe that a child under the age of eighteen (18) years has been abused, abandoned or neglected or who observes the child being subjected to conditions or circumstances that would reasonably result in abuse, abandonment or neglect shall report or cause to be reported within twenty-four (24) hours such conditions or circumstances to the proper law enforcement agency or the department. The department shall be informed by law enforcement of any report made directly to it. If the department knows or has reason to know that an adult in the home has been convicted of lewd and lascivious conduct or felony injury to a child in the past or that the child has been removed from the home for circumstances that resulted in a conviction for lewd and lascivious conduct or felony injury to a child, then the department shall investigate. When the attendance of a physician, resident, intern, nurse, day care worker, or social worker is pursuant to the performance of services as a member of the staff of a hospital or similar institution, he shall notify the person in charge of the institution or his designated delegate who shall make the necessary reports.

For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, the term “duly ordained minister of religion” means a person who has been ordained or set apart, in accordance with the ceremonial, ritual or discipline of a church or religious organization which has been established on the basis of a community of religious faith, belief, doctrines and practices, to hear confessions and confidential communications in accordance with the bona fide doctrines or discipline of that church or religious organization.

The notification requirements of subsection (1) of this section do not apply to a duly ordained minister of religion, with regard to any confession or confidential communication made to him in his ecclesiastical capacity in the course of discipline enjoined by the church to which he belongs if:

The church qualifies as tax-exempt under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3);

The confession or confidential communication was made directly to the duly ordained minister of religion; and

The confession or confidential communication was made in the manner and context that places the duly ordained minister of religion specifically and strictly under a level of confidentiality that is considered inviolate by canon law or church doctrine. A confession or confidential communication made under any other circumstances does not fall under this exemption.

Failure to report as required in this section shall be a misdemeanor.

§ 16-1606. Immunity.

Any person who has reason to believe that a child has been abused, abandoned or neglected and, acting upon that belief, makes a report of abuse, abandonment or neglect as required in section 16-1605, Idaho Code, shall have immunity from any liability, civil or criminal, that might otherwise be incurred or imposed. Any such participant shall have the same immunity with respect to participation in any such judicial proceeding resulting from such report. Any person who reports in bad faith or with malice shall not be protected by this section. Any privilege between husband and wife, or between any professional person except the lawyer-client privilege, including but not limited to physicians, counselors, hospitals, clinics, day care centers and schools and their clients shall not be grounds for excluding evidence at any proceeding regarding the abuse, abandonment or neglect of the child or the cause thereof.

§ 16-1607. Reporting in bad faith — Civil damages.

Any person who makes a report or allegation of child abuse, abandonment or neglect knowing the same to be false or who reports or alleges the same in bad faith or with malice shall be liable to the party or parties against whom the report was made for the amount of actual damages sustained or statutory damages of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), whichever is greater, plus attorney’s fees and costs of suit. If the court finds that the defendant acted with malice or oppression, the court may award treble actual damages or treble statutory damages, whichever is greater.

§ 16-1607A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1608. Emergency removal.

A child may be taken into shelter care by a peace officer without an order issued pursuant to subsection (4) of section 16-1611 or section 16-1619, Idaho Code, only where the child is endangered in his surroundings and prompt removal is necessary to prevent serious physical or mental injury to the child or where the child is an abandoned child pursuant to the provisions of chapter 82, title 39, Idaho Code.
(1)(a) A child may be taken into shelter care by a peace officer without an order issued pursuant to subsection (4) of section 16-1611 or section 16-1619, Idaho Code, only where the child is endangered in his surroundings and prompt removal is necessary to prevent serious physical or mental injury to the child or where the child is an abandoned child pursuant to the provisions of chapter 82, title 39, Idaho Code.

An alleged offender may be removed from the home of the victim of abuse or neglect by a peace officer without an order, issued pursuant to subsection (5) of section 16-1611, Idaho Code, only where the child is endangered and prompt removal of an alleged offender is necessary to prevent serious physical or mental injury to the child.

When a child is taken into shelter care under subsection (1) of this section, he may be held for a maximum of forty-eight (48) hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and holidays, unless a shelter care hearing has been held pursuant to section 16-1615, Idaho Code, and the court orders an adjudicatory hearing.

When an alleged offender is removed from the home under subsection (1)(b) of this section, a motion based on a sworn affidavit by the department must be filed simultaneously with the petition and the court shall determine at a shelter care hearing, held within a maximum of twenty-four (24) hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and holidays, whether the relief sought shall be granted, pending an adjudicatory hearing. Notice of such hearing shall be served upon the alleged offender at the time of removal or other protective relief.

§ 16-1609. Emergency removal — Notice.

A peace officer who takes a child into shelter care under section 16-1608, Idaho Code, shall immediately:

Take the child to a place of shelter; and

Notify the court of the action taken and the place to which the child was taken; and

With the exception of a child abandoned pursuant to the provisions of chapter 82, title 39, Idaho Code, notify each of the parents, guardian or other legal custodian that the child has been taken into shelter care, the type and nature of shelter care, and that the child may be held for a maximum of forty-eight (48) hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and holidays, within which time there must be a shelter care hearing.

A peace officer who takes a child into shelter care under section 16-1608, Idaho Code, shall not be held liable either criminally or civilly unless the action of taking the child was exercised in bad faith and/or the requirements of subsection (1) of this section are not complied with.

§ 16-1609A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1609B. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1610. Petition.

A petition invoking the jurisdiction of the court under this chapter shall be filed in the manner provided in this section:

A petition must be signed by the prosecutor or deputy attorney general before being filed with the court.

Any person or governmental body of this state having evidence of abuse, abandonment, neglect or homelessness of a child may request the attorney general or prosecuting attorney to file a petition. The prosecuting attorney or the attorney general may file a petition on behalf of any child whose parent, guardian, or custodian has been accused in a criminal complaint of the crime of cruel treatment or neglect as defined in section 18-1501, Idaho Code.

Petitions shall be entitled “In the Matter of .............., a child under the age of eighteen (18) years” and shall be verified and set forth with specificity:

The facts which bring the child within the jurisdiction of the court upon the grounds set forth in section 16-1603, Idaho Code, with the actions of each parent described therein;

The name, birth date, sex, and residence address of the child;

The name, birth date, sex, and residence address of all other children living at or having custodial visitation at the home where the injury to the subject child occurred;

The names and residence addresses of both the mother and father, guardian or other custodian. If neither of his parents, guardian or other custodian resides or can be found within the state, or if their residence addresses are unknown, the name of any known adult relative residing within the state;

The names and residence addresses of each person having sole or joint legal custody of the children described in this section;

Whether or not there exists a legal document including, but not limited to, a divorce decree, stipulation or parenting agreement controlling the custodial status of the children described in this section;

Whether the child is in shelter care, and, if so, the type and nature of the shelter care, the circumstances necessitating such care and the date and time he was placed in such care;

When any of the facts required by this section cannot be determined, the petition shall so state. The petition may be based on information and belief but in such case the petition shall state the basis of such information and belief;

If the child has been or will be removed from the home, the petition shall state that:

Remaining in the home was contrary to the welfare of the child;

Vesting legal custody of the child in the department or other authorized agency is in the best interests of the child; and

Reasonable efforts have been made prior to the placement of the child in care to prevent the removal of the child from his home or, if such efforts were not provided, that reasonable efforts to prevent placement were not required because aggravated circumstances were found;

The petition shall state with specificity whether a parent with joint legal custody or a noncustodial parent has been notified of placement;

The petition shall state whether a court has adjudicated the custodial rights of the parents and shall set forth the custodial status of the child;

§ 16-1611. Summons.

After a petition has been filed, the clerk of the court may issue a summons requiring the person or persons who have custody of the child to bring the child before the court at the adjudicatory hearing held in accordance with section 16-1619, Idaho Code. Each parent or guardian shall also be notified in the manner hereinafter provided of the pendency of the case and the time and place set for the hearing. A summons shall be issued and served requiring the appearance of each parent and legal guardian, and a summons may be issued and served for any other person whose presence is required by the child, either of his parents or guardian or any other person whose presence, in the opinion of the court, is necessary.

A copy of the petition shall be attached to each summons.

The summons shall notify each of the parents, guardian or legal custodian of their right to retain and be represented by counsel. Each parent or legal guardian of each child named in the petition shall be notified by the court of the case and of the time and place set for the hearing.

If based on facts presented to the court, it appears that the court has jurisdiction upon the grounds set forth in section 16-1603, Idaho Code, and the court finds that the child should be removed from his present condition or surroundings because continuation in such condition or surroundings would be contrary to the welfare of the child and vesting legal custody with the department or other authorized agency would be in the child’s best interests, the court shall include on the summons an order to remove the child. The order to remove the child shall specifically state that continuation in the present condition or surroundings is contrary to the welfare of the child and shall require a peace officer or other suitable person to take the child at once to a place of shelter care designated by the authorized agency which shall provide shelter care for the child.

If it appears that the child is safe in his present condition or surroundings and it is not in his best interest to remove him at this time, the court may issue a protective order based on an affidavit pending the adjudicatory hearing. If the child is in joint custody, the protective order shall state with specificity the rights and responsibilities of each parent. Each parent shall be provided with a copy of the protective order.

§ 16-1612. Service of summons — Travel expenses — Necessary witnesses.

Service of summons shall be made personally by delivery of an attested copy thereof to the person summoned; provided that if the court is satisfied that it is impracticable to serve personally such summons or the notice provided for in the preceding section, he may order service by registered mail addressed to the last known address, or by publication thereof, or both. It shall be sufficient to confer jurisdiction if service is effected at least forty-eight (48) hours before the time fixed in the summons for the hearing.

When publication is used the summons shall be published once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county; such newspaper to be designated by the court in the order for publication of the summons, and such publication shall have the same force and effect as though such person had been personally served with said summons.

Service of summons, process or notice required by this chapter shall be made by the sheriff or other person appointed by the court, and a return must be made on the summons showing that service has been made.

The court may authorize payment of any necessary travel expenses incurred by any person summoned or otherwise required to appear at the hearing of any case coming within the purview of this chapter, and such expenses when approved by the court shall be a charge upon the county, except that not more than five (5) witnesses on behalf of any parent or guardian may be required to attend such hearing at the expense of the county.

The court may summon the appearance of any person whose presence is deemed necessary as a witness.

The child, each of his parents, guardian or custodian shall be notified as soon as practicable after the filing of a petition and prior to the start of a hearing of their right to be represented by counsel.

If any person summoned as herein provided shall, without reasonable cause, fail to appear, the court may proceed in such person’s absence or such person may be proceeded against for contempt of court.

Where the summons cannot be served, or the parties served fail to obey the same, or in any case when it shall be made to appear to the court that the service will be ineffectual, or that the welfare of the child requires that he be brought forthwith into the custody of the court, a warrant or capias may be issued for the parent, guardian or the child.

§ 16-1613. Hearings under the child protective act.

Proceedings under this chapter shall be dealt with by the court at hearings separate from those for adults and without a jury. The hearings shall be conducted in an informal manner and may be adjourned from time to time. The general public shall be excluded, and only such persons shall be admitted as are found by the court to have a direct interest in the case. The child may be excluded from hearings at any time at the discretion of the court. If the parent or guardian is without counsel, the court shall inform them of their right to be represented by counsel and to appeal from any disposition or order of the court.

When a child is summoned as a witness in any hearing under this act, notwithstanding any other statutory provision, parents, a counselor, a friend, or other person having a supportive relationship with the child shall, if available, be permitted to remain in the courtroom at the witness stand with the child during the child’s testimony unless, in written findings made and entered, the court finds that the constitutional right of the child’s parent(s), guardian(s) or other custodian(s) to a fair hearing will be unduly prejudiced.

At any stage of a proceeding under this chapter, if the court determines that it is in the best interests of the child or society, the court may cause the proceeding to be expanded or altered to include full or partial consideration of the cause under the juvenile corrections act without terminating the original proceeding under this chapter.

§ 16-1614. Appointment of guardian ad litem, counsel for guardian ad litem, counsel for child.

In any proceeding under this chapter for a child under the age of twelve (12) years, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the child or children and shall appoint counsel to represent the guardian ad litem, unless the guardian ad litem is already represented by counsel. If a court does not have available to it a guardian ad litem program or a sufficient number of guardians ad litem, the court shall appoint counsel for the child. In appropriate cases, the court may appoint a guardian ad litem for the child and counsel to represent the guardian ad litem and may, in addition, appoint counsel to represent the child.

In any proceeding under this chapter for a child twelve (12) years of age or older, the court:

Shall appoint counsel to represent the child and may, in addition, appoint a guardian ad litem; or

Where appointment of counsel is not practicable or not appropriate, may appoint a guardian ad litem for the child and shall appoint counsel to represent the guardian ad litem, unless the guardian ad litem is already represented by counsel.

Counsel appointed for the child under the provisions of this section shall be paid for by the county unless the party for whom counsel is appointed has an independent estate sufficient to pay such costs.

§ 16-1615. Shelter care hearing.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, when a child is taken into shelter care pursuant to section 16-1608 or 16-1611, Idaho Code, a hearing to determine whether the child should be released shall be held according to the provisions of this section.

Each of the parents or custodian from whom the child was removed shall be given notice of the shelter care hearing. Such notice shall include the time, place, and purpose of the hearing; and, that such person is entitled to be represented by legal counsel. Notice as required by this subsection shall be given at least twenty-four (24) hours before the shelter care hearing.

Notice of the shelter care hearing shall be given to the parents or custodian from whom the child was removed by personal service and the return of service shall be filed with the court and to any person having joint legal or physical custody of the subject child. Provided, however, that such service need not be made where the undelivered notice is returned to the court along with an affidavit stating that such parents or custodian could not be located or were out of the state.

The shelter care hearing may be continued for a reasonable time upon request by the parent, custodian or counsel for the child.

If, upon the completion of the shelter care hearing, it is shown that:

A petition has been filed; and

There is reasonable cause to believe the child comes within the jurisdiction of the court under this chapter and either:

The department made reasonable efforts to eliminate the need for shelter care but the efforts were unsuccessful; or

The department made reasonable efforts to eliminate the need for shelter care but was not able to safely provide preventive services; and

The child could not be placed in the temporary sole custody of a parent having joint legal or physical custody; and

It is contrary to the welfare of the child to remain in the home; and

It is in the best interests of the child to remain in temporary shelter care pending the conclusion of the adjudicatory hearing.

Upon finding reasonable cause pursuant to subsection (5)(b) of this section, the court shall order an adjudicatory hearing to be held as soon as possible, but in no event later than thirty (30) days from the date the petition was filed. In addition, the court shall inquire whether there is reason to believe that the child is an Indian child.

Upon entry of an order of shelter care, the court shall inquire:

If the child is of school age, about the department’s efforts to keep the child in the school at which the child is currently enrolled; and

If a sibling group was removed from their home, about the department’s efforts to place the siblings together, or if the department has not placed or will not be placing the siblings together, about a plan to ensure frequent visitation or ongoing interaction among the siblings, unless visitation or ongoing interaction would be contrary to the safety or well-being of one (1) or more of the siblings.

If there is reasonable cause to believe that the child comes within the jurisdiction of the court under this chapter, but a reasonable effort to prevent placement of the child outside the home could be affected by a protective order safeguarding the child’s welfare, the court may issue, within twenty-four (24) hours of such hearing, a protective order. Any evidence may be considered by the court that is of the type which reasonable people may rely upon.

If the court does not find that the child should be placed in or remain in shelter care under subsection (5) of this section, the child shall be released.

If the court does not find reasonable cause pursuant to subsection (5)(b) of this section, the court shall dismiss the petition.

The court shall issue, within twenty-four (24) hours of such hearing, a shelter care order placing the child in the temporary legal custody of the department or other authorized agency. Any evidence may be considered by the court which is of the type which reasonable people may rely upon.